hr-HR: Prikladnost za vremenske uvjete: Sve vremenske prilike; Hladno vrijeme; Vruće vrijeme; Zatvoreni prostor; Vlažno vrijeme; Ostalo
da: Egnethed til vejrforhold: Al slags vejr; Koldt vejr; Varmt vejr; Indendørs; Vådt vejr; Andet
fr: Conditions météorologiques d’utilisation: Tout temps; Temps froid; Temps chaud; Intérieur; Temps humide; Autre
nb: Værforhold: Allværs; Kaldt vær; Varmt vær; Innendørs; Vått vær; Annet
es: Compatibilidad climática: Para todo clima; Clima frío; Clima cálido; Interior; Clima húmedo; Otro
ru: Пригодность к погодным условиям: Всепогодные; Холодная погода; Жаркая погода; Для помещений; Влажная погода; Другое
sk-SK: Vhodnosť pre počasie: Do každého počasia; Do chladného počasia; Do horúceho počasia; Do interiéru; Do vlhkého počasia; Iné
nl: Geschiktheid voor weersomstandigheden: Alle weersomstandigheden; Koud weer; Heet weer; Binnen; Nat weer; Overige
vi: Sự phù hợp về thời tiết: Mọi thời tiết; Thời tiết lạnh; Thời tiết nóng; Trong nhà; Thời tiết ẩm ướt; Khác
ja: 気候適性: 全天候型; 寒冷地用; 暑熱地用; 屋内用; 雨天用; その他
pt-PT: Adequação às condições meteorológicas: Todas as condições meteorológicas; Tempo frio; Tempo quente; Interior; Tempo húmido; Outro
fi: Soveltuvuus sääolosuhteisiin: Joka sään; Kylmä sää; Kuuma sää; Sisäkäyttö; Märkä sää; Muu
el: Καταλληλότητα καιρικών συνθηκών: Παντός καιρού; Κρύος καιρός; Ζεστός καιρός; Εσωτερικός χώρος; Υγρός καιρός; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vremenska primernost: Za vse vremenske razmere; Za hladno vreme; Za toplo vreme; Za notranje prostore; Za mokro vreme; Drugo
lt-LT: Oro sąlygų tinkamumas: Bet kokiam orui; Šaltam orui; Karštam orui; Vidui; Drėgnam orui; Kita
sv: Väderlämplighet: Alla väder; Kallt väder; Varmt väder; Inomhus; Blött väder; Övrigt
tr: Hava koşullarına uygunluk: Tüm hava koşulları; Soğuk hava; Sıcak hava; İç mekan; Yağışlı hava; Diğer
th: ความเหมาะสมของสภาพอากาศ: ทุกสภาพอากาศ; อากาศเย็น; อากาศร้อน; ในร่ม; สภาพอากาศเปียกชื้น; อื่นๆ
ko: 기상 조건 적합성: 전천후; 한랭 기후용; 고온 기후용; 실내용; 습윤 기후용; 기타
bg-BG: Пригодност за атмосферни условия: За всякакви метеорологични условия; За студено време; За горещо време; На закрито; За влажно време; Други
ro-RO: Adecvare pentru condiții meteorologice: Pentru orice vreme; Vreme rece; Vreme caldă; Interior; Vreme umedă; Altele
hu: Időjárásra való alkalmasság: Minden időjáráshoz; Hideg időjáráshoz; Meleg időjáráshoz; Beltéri; Nedves időjáráshoz; Egyéb
it: Idoneità alle condizioni ambientali: Tutte le condizioni atmosferiche; Climi freddi; Climi caldi; Interno; Climi umidi; Altro
cs: Vhodnost pro počasí: Do každého počasí; Do chladného počasí; Do horkého počasí; Do interiéru; Do vlhkého počasí; Jiné
en: Weather suitability: All-weather; Cold weather; Hot weather; Indoor; Wet weather; Other
de: Wettertauglichkeit: Allwetter; Kaltes Wetter; Heißes Wetter; Indoor; Nasses Wetter; Sonstige
zh-CN: 天气适宜性: 全天候; 寒冷天气; 炎热天气; 室内; 潮湿天气; 其他
zh-TW: 天候適用性: 全天候; 寒冷天氣; 炎熱天氣; 室內; 潮濕天氣; 其他
pl: Przydatność pogodowa: Na każdą pogodę; Na chłodną pogodę; Na upalną pogodę; Do wnętrz; Na mokrą pogodę; Inne
pt-BR: Adequação ao clima: Para todos os climas; Para clima frio; Para clima quente; Ambiente interno; Para clima úmido; Outros